Illinois, session 104th, SB3758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. School restroom access.8    (a) In this Section, "biological sex" means the physical 9condition of being male or female, as determined by a person's 10chromosomes, assigned at birth.11    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 12contrary, a school district shall regulate and restrict access 13to public restrooms, locker rooms, dressing rooms, and other 14similar places on the basis of biological sex and shall adopt a 15policy that provides for gender neutral or alternative 16facilities for students, staff, and members of the public, as 17the school district deems appropriate. 18    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to in any 19way require a school district to: 20        (1) limit access by a minor accompanied by an adult 21    guardian of the opposite sex into a specified facility 22    appropriate for the adult guardian;23        (2) prohibit a person with disabilities from using a   SB3758- 2 -LRB104 19173 LNS 32618 b1    specified facility appropriate to the biological sex of 2    either the disabled person or of an adult caretaker 3    providing assistance; or4        (3) prohibit access to these facilities by custodial 5    staff, school staff, or other persons in an emergency 6    situation. 7    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)8    Sec. 34-18.88. School restroom access.9    (a) In this Section, "biological sex" means the physical 10condition of being male or female, as determined by a person's 11chromosomes, assigned at birth.12    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 13contrary, the school district shall regulate and restrict 14access to public restrooms, locker rooms, dressing rooms, and 15other similar places on the basis of biological sex and shall 16adopt a policy that provides for gender neutral or alternative 17facilities for students, staff, and members of the public, as 18the school district deems appropriate. 19    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to in any 20way require the school district to: 21        (1) limit access by a minor accompanied by an adult 22    guardian of the opposite sex into a specified facility 23    appropriate for the adult guardian;24        (2) prohibit a person with disabilities from using a 25    specified facility appropriate to the biological sex of   SB3758- 3 -LRB104 19173 LNS 32618 b1    either the disabled person or of an adult caretaker 2    providing assistance; or3        (3) prohibit access to these facilities by custodial 4    staff, school staff, or other persons in an emergency 5    situation.